Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 163.160 is amended to read:
163.160. (1) A person commits the crime of assault in the fourth degree if the person:
(a) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical injury to another;
(b) With criminal negligence causes physical injury to  another by means of a deadly weapon;
or
(c) With criminal negligence causes serious physical injury to another who is  a vulnerable user
of a public way, as defined in ORS 801.608, by means of a motor vehicle.
(2) Assault in the fourth degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, assault in the fourth  degree under subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section  is a Class C felony if the person commits the crime of assault in the
fourth degree and:
(a) The assault is committed in the immediate presence of, or  is witnessed by, the person’s or
the victim’s minor child or stepchild or  a minor child residing within the household of the person
or victim;
(b) The person has been previously convicted of violating this section or ORS 163.165,  163.175,
163.185, 163.187 or 163.190,  or of committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, and the
victim in the previous conviction is the same person who is the victim of the current crime;
(c) The person has at least three previous convictions  for violating this section or ORS 163.165,
163.175, 163.185, 163.187 or 163.190 or  for committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, in
any combination; or
(d) The person commits the assault knowing that the victim is pregnant.
(4) If a person is convicted of misdemeanor  assault in the fourth degree constituting
domestic violence as an element of the  crime as described ORS 132.586, the court shall en-
sure that the judgment document reflects that the conviction constitutes  domestic violence.
[(4)] (5)  For purposes of subsection (3)  of this section, an assault is witnessed if the assault is
seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the child.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 163.190 is amended to read:
163.190. (1) A person commits the crime of menacing if by  word or conduct the person inten-
tionally attempts to place another person in fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(2) Menacing is a Class A misdemeanor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 1
(3) If a person is convicted of menacing constituting  domestic violence as an element of
the crime as described  ORS 132.586, the court shall ensure that the judgment document re-
flects that the conviction constitutes domestic violence.
SECTION 3.  ORS 423.478, as amended by section 20, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations  between sanctions, supervision, services and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, [ the] each county, in partnership with the department, shall  assume
responsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and services for offenders  convicted of
felonies , [ or] designated drug-related misdemeanors  or designated person misdemeanors  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board  of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to  12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition of parole, pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of  incarceration,
when an  offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4), the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing  sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by the  supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS 163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release,  shall order the
person to report to  the Department of State Police, a city police department or a county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first day the person works at, carries  on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or  attendance status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have  the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(c);
(B) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(c);
(C) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(c);
(D) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(c);
(E) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(c); or
(F) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(c).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the  fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document
is as described in ORS 163.160 (4);
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 2
(B) Menacing constituting domestic violence if the judgment document  is as described in
ORS 163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 423.525 is amended to read:
423.525. (1) A county, group of  counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall apply to
the Director of the Department of Corrections in a manner and form prescribed by the  director for
funding made available under ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The application shall include a community
corrections  plan.  The Department of Corrections shall provide consultation and technical assistance
to counties to aid in the development and implementation of community corrections plans.
(2)(a) From July 1, 1995, until June 30, 1999, a county, group of counties or  intergovernmental
corrections entity may  make application requesting funding for the construction, acquisition, ex-
pansion or remodeling of correctional facilities to serve the county, group of  counties or intergov-
ernmental corrections entity. The department shall review the  application for funding of
correctional facilities in accordance with criteria that consider design, cost, capacity,  need, operat-
ing efficiency and viability based on the county’s,  group of counties’ or intergovernmental cor-
rections entity’s ability to provide for ongoing operations.
(b)(A) If the application is approved, the department shall present the  application with a request
to finance the facility with financing agreements to the State  Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon  Department  of Administrative Services. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph, upon approval of the request by the State Treasurer and the Director of  the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, the facility may be financed with financing agree-
ments, and  certificates of participation issued pursuant thereto, as provided in ORS 283.085 to
283.092. All decisions approving or denying applications and  requests for financing under this sec-
tion are final. No such decision is subject to judicial review of any kind.
(B) If requests to finance county  correctional facility projects are submitted after February 22,
1996, and the requests have not  been approved by the department on the date a session of the
Legislative Assembly convenes, the requests are also subject to the  approval of the Legislative As-
sembly.
(c) After approval  but prior to the solicitation of bids or proposals for the construction of a
project, the county, group  of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity and the department
shall enter into a written agreement that determines the procedures,  and the parties responsible, for
the awarding of contracts and  the administration of the construction project for the approved
correctional facility. If the parties are unable to agree on the terms of the written  agreement, the
Governor shall decide the terms of the agreement. The Governor’s decision is final.
(d) After approval of a construction project, the administration of  the project shall be conducted
as provided in the agreement required by paragraph (c) of  this subsection. The agreement must re-
quire at  a minimum that the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall
submit to the department any change order or alteration of the design  of the project that, singly
or in the aggregate, reduces  the capacity of the correctional facility or materially changes the ser-
vices or functions  of the project. The change order or alteration is not effective until approved by
the department. In reviewing the change order  or alteration, the department shall consider whether
the implementation of the change  order or alteration will have any material adverse impact on the
parties to any financing agreements or the holders of any certificates of participation issued to  fund
county correctional facilities under this section.  In making its decision, the department may rely on
the opinions of the Department of Justice, bond counsel or professional financial advisers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 283.085, for purposes of this section, “financing agreement”  means a
lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a  loan agreement or any other agreement
to finance a correctional facility described in  this section, or to refinance a previously executed fi-
nancing agreement for the financing of a correctional facility. The state is not required to own or
operate a correctional facility  in order to finance it under ORS 283.085 to 283.092 and this section.
The state, an intergovernmental corrections entity, county or group of counties may enter into any
agreements, including, but not limited to, leases and  subleases, that are reasonably necessary or
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 3
generally accepted by the financial community for purposes  of acquiring or securing financing as
authorized by this section. In financing  county correctional facilities under this section, “property
rights” as used in ORS 283.085 includes leasehold mortgages of the  state’s rights under leases of
correctional facilities from counties.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law,  county charter or ordinance, a county may
convey or lease to  the State of Oregon, acting by and through the Department of Corrections, title
to interests in, or a lease of, any real property, facilities or personal property owned  by the county
for the purpose of  financing the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility. Upon the payment of all principal and interest on, or  upon any other satisfaction of, the
financing agreement used to finance the construction, acquisition, expansion or  remodeling of a
correctional facility, the  state shall reconvey its interest in, or terminate and surrender its leasehold
of, the  property or facilities, including the financed construction, acquisition, expansion or remod-
eling, to the county. In addition to any authority granted by ORS 283.089, for  the purposes of ob-
taining financing, the state may enter into agreements under which the state may grant  to trustees
or lenders leases, subleases and  other security interests in county property conveyed or leased to
the state under this subsection and in the property or facilities financed by financing agreements.
(5) In connection with the financing of correctional facilities,  the Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services may bill  the Department of Corrections, and the Department
of Corrections shall pay the amounts billed, in the same manner as provided in ORS 283.089.  As
required by ORS 283.091,  the Department of Corrections and the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall include in the  Governor’s budget all amounts that will be due in each fiscal
period under financing agreements for correctional facilities. Amounts payable by the  state under
a financing agreement for the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling  of a correctional
facility  are  limited to available funds as defined in ORS 283.085, and no lender, trustee, certificate
holder or county has any claim or recourse against any funds of the state other than available funds.
(6) The director shall adopt rules that  may be necessary for the administration, evaluation and
implementation of ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The standards shall be sufficiently flexible to  foster the
development of new and improved  supervision or rehabilitative practices and maximize local control.
(7) When a county assumes responsibility under ORS 423.500 to 423.560  for correctional services
previously provided by the department, the county and  the department shall enter into an inter-
governmental agreement that includes a local community corrections plan consisting of  program
descriptions, budget allocation, performance objectives and methods of evaluating  each correctional
service to be provided  by the county. The performance objectives must include in dominant part
reducing future criminal conduct.  The methods of evaluating services must include, to the extent
of available information systems resources, the collection  and analysis of data sufficient to deter-
mine the apparent effect of the services on future criminal conduct.
(8) All community corrections plans shall comply with rules adopted pursuant to ORS  423.500
to 423.560, and shall include  but need not be limited to an outline of the basic structure and the
supervision, services and local sanctions to be applied  to offenders convicted of felonies , [ and] des-
ignated drug-related misdemeanors  and designated person misdemeanors  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after  January 1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for a violation of a condition of parole,  pro-
bation or post-prison supervision; and
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(9) All community corrections plans shall designate a  community corrections manager of the
county or counties and shall provide that the  administration of community corrections under ORS
423.500 to 423.560 shall be under such manager.
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 4
(10) No amendment to or modification of a  county-approved community corrections plan shall
be placed in effect without prior notice to the director for purposes of statewide data collection and
reporting.
(11) The obligation of  the state to provide funding and the scheduling for providing funding of
a project approved  under this section is dependent upon the ability of the state to access public
security markets to sell financing agreements.
(12) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Evaluate the community corrections policy established in ORS 423.475,  423.478, 423.483 and
423.500 to 423.560; and
(b) Assess the effectiveness of local revocation options.
(13) As used in this section, “designated drug-related misdemeanor”  and “designated person
misdemeanor”  [ has the meaning given that term ] have  the meanings given those terms  in ORS
423.478.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 137.633 is amended to read:
137.633. (1) A person convicted of a  felony , [ or] a designated drug-related misdemeanor  or a
designated person misdemeanor and sentenced to probation or to  the legal and physical custody
of the supervisory authority under ORS 137.124 (2) is eligible for a reduction in  the period of pro-
bation or local control  post-prison supervision for complying with terms of probation or post-prison
supervision, including the payment of restitution and  participation in recidivism reduction programs.
(2) The maximum reduction  under this section may not exceed 50 percent of the period of pro-
bation or local control post-prison supervision imposed.
(3) A reduction under this section may not be used to shorten the period of  probation or local
control post-prison supervision to less than six months.
(4)(a) The Department of Corrections shall adopt  rules to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(b) The supervisory authority shall comply with the rules adopted under this section.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(b) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
[(b)] (c)  “Local control post-prison supervision” means post-prison supervision that is supervised
by a local supervisory authority pursuant to ORS 144.101.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections  by section 1 (4), chapter , Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for community cor-
rections, is increased by $7,060,171, in order  to implement the amendments to ORS 423.478
by section 3 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 497 (SB 497-B) Page 6